Maryland, session 2025, HB0820.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–10A–06.
(a) On a quarterly basis, each carrier shall submit to the Commissioner, on the
form the Commissioner requires, a report that describes:
(1) the number of members entitled to health care benefits under a policy,
plan, or certificate issued or delivered in the State by the carrier;
(2) the number of clean claims for reimbursement processed by the carrier;
(3) the activities of the carrier under this subtitle, including:
(i) the outcome of each grievance filed with the carrier;
(ii) the number and outcomes of cases that were considered
emergency cases under § 15–10A–02(b)(2)(i) of this subtitle;
– 1 –

Ch. 747 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) the time within which the carrier made a grievance decision on
each emergency case;
(iv) the time within which the carrier made a grievance decision on
all other cases that were not considered emergency cases;
(v) the number of grievances filed with the carrier that resulted from
an adverse decision involving length of stay for inpatient hospitalization as related to the
medical procedure involved;
(vi) the number of adverse decisions issued by the carrier under §
15–10A–02(f) of this subtitle, whether the adverse decision involved a prior authorization
or step therapy protocol, [and] the type of service at issue in the adverse decisions, AND
WHETHER AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER SOFTWARE TOOL
WAS USED IN MAKING THE ADVERSE DECISION;
(vii) the number of adverse decisions overturned after a
reconsideration request under § 15–10B–06 of this title; and
(viii) the number of requests made and granted under § 15–831(c)(1)
and (2) of this title; and
(4) the number and outcome of all other cases that are not subject to
activities of the carrier under this subtitle that resulted from an adverse decision involving
the length of stay for inpatient hospitalization as related to the medical procedure involved.
(b) The Commissioner shall:
(1) compile an annual summary report based on the information provided:
(i) under subsection (a) of this section; and
(ii) by the Secretary under § 19–705.2(e) of the Health – General
Article;
(2) report any violations or actions taken under § 15–10B–11 of this title;
and
(3) provide copies of the summary report to the Governor and, subject to §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the General Assembly.
15–10B–05.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 747
(2) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” MEANS AN ENGINEERED OR
MACHINE–BASED SYSTEM THAT VARIES IN ITS LEVEL OF AUTONOMY AND THAT CAN,
FOR EXPLICIT OR IMPLICIT OBJECTIVES, INFER FROM THE INPUT IT RECEIVES HOW
TO GENERATE OUTPUTS THAT CAN INFLUENCE PHYSICAL OR VIRTUAL
ENVIRONMENTS.
(3) “CARRIER” MEANS:
(I) AN INSURER;
(II) A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN;
(III) A HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION;
(IV) A DENTAL PLAN ORGANIZATION; OR
(V) ANY OTHER PERSON THAT PROVIDES HEALTH BENEFIT
PLANS SUBJECT TO REGULATION BY THE STATE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) A CARRIER THAT:
(I) USES AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR
OTHER SOFTWARE TOOL FOR THE PURPOSE OF UTILIZATION REVIEW; OR
(II) CONTRACTS WITH OR OTHERWISE WORKS THROUGH AN
ENTITY THAT USES AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER
SOFTWARE TOOL FOR THE PURPOSE OF UTILIZATION REVIEW; AND
(2) A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER OR PRIVATE REVIEW AGENT
THAT:
(I) CONTRACTS WITH A CARRIER TO PROVIDE UTILIZATION
REVIEW ON BEHALF OF THE CARRIER; AND
(II) USES AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR
OTHER SOFTWARE TOOL FOR THE PURPOSE OF CONDUCTING UTILIZATION REVIEW
ON BEHALF OF THE CARRIER.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO
THIS SECTION SHALL ENSURE THAT:
– 3 –

Ch. 747 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER
SOFTWARE TOOL BASES ITS DETERMINATIONS ON:
(I) AN ENROLLEE’S MEDICAL OR OTHER CLINICAL HISTORY;
(II) INDIVIDUAL CLINICAL CIRCUMSTANCES AS PRESENTED BY
A REQUESTING PROVIDER; OR
(III) OTHER RELEVANT CLINICAL INFORMATION CONTAINED IN
THE ENROLLEE’S MEDICAL OR OTHER CLINICAL RECORD;
(2) AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER
SOFTWARE TOOL DOES NOT BASE ITS DETERMINATIONS SOLELY ON A GROUP
DATASET;
(3) THE CRITERIA AND GUIDELINES FOR USING AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER SOFTWARE TOOL FOR MAKING
DETERMINATIONS COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS TITLE;
(4) AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER
SOFTWARE TOOL DOES NOT REPLACE THE ROLE OF A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER IN
THE DETERMINATION PROCESS UNDER § 15–10B–07 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(5) THE USE OF AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR
OTHER SOFTWARE TOOL DOES NOT RESULT IN UNFAIR DISCRIMINATION AGAINST
ENROLLEES THAT IS PROHIBITED BY FEDERAL OR STATE LAW;
(6) AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER
SOFTWARE TOOL IS FAIRLY AND EQUITABLY APPLIED, INCLUDING IN ACCORDANCE
WITH ANY APPLICABLE REGULATIONS AND GUIDANCE ISSUED BY THE FEDERAL
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES;
(7) AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER
SOFTWARE TOOL IS OPEN TO INSPECTION FOR AUDIT OR COMPLIANCE REVIEWS BY
THE COMMISSIONER;
(8) WRITTEN POLICIES AND PROCEDURES ARE INCLUDED IN THE
UTILIZATION PLAN SUBMITTED UNDER § 15–10B–05 OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING
HOW AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER SOFTWARE TOOL WILL
BE USED AND WHAT OVERSIGHT WILL BE PROVIDED;
(9) THE PERFORMANCE, USE, AND OUTCOMES OF AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER SOFTWARE TOOL ARE REVIEWED AND
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 747
REVISED, IF NECESSARY AND AT LEAST ON A QUARTERLY BASIS, TO MAXIMIZE
ACCURACY AND RELIABILITY;
(10) PATIENT DATA IS NOT USED BEYOND ITS INTENDED AND STATED
PURPOSE, CONSISTENT WITH THE FEDERAL HEALTH INSURANCE PORTABILITY AND
ACCOUNTABILITY ACT OF 1996, AS APPLICABLE; AND
(11) AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER
SOFTWARE TOOL DOES NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY CAUSE HARM TO AN
ENROLLEE.
(D) AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER SOFTWARE
TOOL MAY NOT DENY, DELAY OR MODIFY HEALTH CARE SERVICES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 5 –